Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 13 Auditor General

22-13-1.
Appointment — Qualifications — Oath — Bond — Office space — Rules and regulations.

The auditor general shall be appointed by the joint committee on legislative services, referred to in this chapter as “the committee.” At the time of appointment, the auditor general shall have had active experience in general accounting principles and practices in this state for a total period of at least five (5) years. Vacancies in the office shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

The committee shall employ qualified persons necessary for the efficient operation of the office and shall fix their duties and compensation and those persons shall be in the unclassified service.

No person shall be employed as an auditor who does not have adequate technical training and proficiency, and a baccalaureate degree from a college or university, and no person shall be employed or retained as legal advisor on either a full-time or a part-time basis who is not a member of the Rhode Island bar.

The auditor general, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, shall take and subscribe to the oath of office required of state officers by the state constitution.

The auditor general shall be covered by the state’s blanket position bond and conditioned that he or she will well and faithfully discharge the duties of his or her office; promptly report any delinquency or shortage discovered in any accounts and records audited by him or her; and promptly pay over and account for any and all funds that shall come into his or her hands as auditor.

All auditors employed by the auditor general shall be covered by a blanket position bond. The bonds or bond shall meet and contain the same conditions as are required in the bond of the auditor general.

All bonds shall be filed with the committee. If an auditor is not covered in the blanket position bond, an individual bond shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the employee received notice of his or her employment. The amount of the bond shall be determined by the auditor general. Failure to file an individual bond or to be covered in the blanket position bond shall terminate his or her employment.

The annual premium of all bonds shall be paid out of any funds provided for the operation of the office.

The auditor general shall be provided with suitable quarters, but to facilitate auditing and to eliminate unnecessary traveling, the joint committee on legislative services may establish divisions, including a performance investigation division, and assign auditors to each division and determine their duties and the areas of the state to be served by the respective divisions. The auditor general shall be provided and furnished with any space that may be necessary to carry out his or her functions in other areas of the state.

The auditor general may make and enforce reasonable rules and regulations necessary to facilitate audits and investigations that the joint committee on legislative services authorizes the auditor general to perform. This includes the post-audit of the financial transactions and accounts of the state that is provided for by the finance committee of the house of representatives.

No full-time employee of the office of auditor general shall serve as an executive, officer, or employee of any political party committee, organization, or association. Neither the auditor general nor any employee of the auditor general shall become a candidate for election to public office unless he or she shall first resign from his or her office or employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 525, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 3.

22-13-2.
Termination of appointment.

Failure on the part of the auditor general to perform the mandatory duties under the direction of the committee shall constitute cause for termination of appointment. The appointment of the auditor general may be terminated at any time by a majority vote of the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 225, § 1.

22-13-3.
Salaries and expenses.

The expenses of the members of the committee shall be approved by the chairperson of the committee and paid from the appropriation for legislative expense.

The auditor general shall prepare and annually submit to the committee a proposed budget for the ensuing fiscal year. The committee shall review the budget request and may amend or change the budget request as it deems necessary. The budget request, as amended or changed by the committee, shall become the operating budget of the auditor general for the ensuing fiscal year; provided, that the budget so adopted may subsequently be amended under the same procedure.

Within the limitations of the approved operating budget, the salaries and expenses of the auditor general and his or her staff shall be paid from the appropriation for legislative expense or any other moneys appropriated by the legislature for that purpose. The joint committee on legislative services shall approve all bills for salaries and expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 225, § 1.

22-13-4.
Definitions — Duties of auditor general — Investigations by committee.

The following words and phrases have the following meanings unless a different meaning is required by the context:

“Performance audit” means an examination of the effectiveness of administration and its efficiency and adequacy in terms of the program of the state agency authorized by law to be performed. The “performance audit” may also include a review of the agency in terms of compliance with federal and state laws and executive orders relating to equal employment opportunities and the set aside for minority businesses.

“Political subdivision” means a separate agency or unit of local government created or established by law and includes, but is not limited to, the following and the officers of the following: authority, board, branch, bureau, city, commission, council, consolidated government, county, department, district, institution, metropolitan government, municipality, office, officer, public corporation, town, or village.

“Post-audit” means an audit made at some point after the completion of a transaction or a group of transactions.

“State agency” means a separate agency or unit of state government created or established by law and includes, but is not limited to, the following and the officers of the following: authority, board, branch, bureau, commission, council, department, division, institution, office, officer, or public corporation, as the case may be, except any agency or unit within the legislative branch of state government.

The auditor general shall make post-audits and performance audits of public records and perform related duties as prescribed by the committee. He or she shall perform his or her duties independently but under the general policies established by the committee.

The auditor general shall have the power and duty to make post-audits and performance audits of the accounts and records of all state agencies, including the board of governors for higher education and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, as defined in this section.

The auditor general shall have the power, when requested by a majority of the committee, to make post-audits and performance audits of accounts and records of any other public body or political subdivision, or any association or corporation created or established by any general or special law of the general assembly, or any person, association, or corporation to which monies of the state have been appropriated by the general assembly. Nothing in the subdivision shall be construed to apply to public utilities.

The auditor general shall perform or have performed annually a complete post-audit of the financial transactions and accounts of the state when approved by the chairperson of the joint committee on legislative services.

The committee may at any time, without regard to whether the legislature is then in session or out of session, take under investigation any matter within the scope of an audit either completed or then being conducted by the auditor general, and in connection with that investigation may exercise the powers of subpoena vested by law in a standing committee of the legislature.

The auditor general may, when directed by the committee, designate and direct any auditor employed by him or her to audit any accounts or records within the power of the auditor general to audit. The auditor shall report his or her findings for review by the auditor general, who shall prepare the audit report.

The audit report shall make special mention of:

Any violation of the laws within the scope of the audit; and

Any illegal or improper expenditure, any improper accounting procedures, all failures to properly record financial transactions, and all other inaccuracies, irregularities, shortages, and defalcations.

At the conclusion of the audit, the auditor general or his or her designated representative will conduct an exit conference with the official whose office or department is subject to audit and submit to him or her a draft report which includes a list of findings and recommendations. If an official is not available for the exit conference, delivery of the draft report is presumed to be sufficient notice. The official must submit to the auditor general within sixty (60) days after the receipt of the draft report his or her written reply as to:

Acceptance and plan of implementation of each recommendation;

Reason(s) for non-acceptance of a recommendation.

Should the auditor general determine that the written explanation or rebuttal of the official whose office is subject to audit is unsatisfactory, he or she shall, as soon as practicable, report his or her findings to the joint committee on legislative services.

A copy of the audit report shall be submitted to each member of the committee.

If the auditor general discovers any errors, unusual practices, or any other discrepancies in connection with his or her audit or post-audit of a state agency or state officers, the auditor general shall, as soon as practicable, notify in writing the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, respectively.

The auditor general shall annually review the capital development program to determine: (1) the status of all projects included in the program; (2) whether the funds are being properly expended for their intended purposes; (3) the completion date or projected completion date of the projects; (4) which projects require professional services and to determine the identity of individuals or firms appointed; and (5) the expended and unexpended funds. This report shall be annually submitted to the general assembly on the first Wednesday in February.

The auditor general shall supervise, coordinate, and/or conduct investigations and inspections or oversight reviews with the purpose of preventing and detecting fraud, waste, abuse and mismanagement in the expenditure of public funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1975; ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 200, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 575, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 33; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 3.

22-13-5.
Submission of audits, consultant reports to auditor general.

Every state agency is directed to forward a copy of any audits and consultant reports to the auditor general within fifteen (15) days after the receipt of those documents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 194, § 2.

22-13-6.
Requests for auditing and accounting services.

Every state department and agency which contemplates securing the services of an independent accounting firm to perform an audit of a federal assistance grant program shall first request the written approval of the auditor general.

The request to the auditor general shall indicate the period of audit, the services to be rendered, the requirement for services (grant provisions, statutory requirements, etc.), the source(s) of funding, and any other pertinent information. The request shall be transmitted in writing to the auditor general on a form provided for that purpose at least ninety (90) days in advance of any contractual negotiations with independent public accountants by any state department or agency.

Upon receipt of the request, the auditor general shall conduct an analysis of the request to determine the scope and requirements of the audit services requested in coordination with the audit responsibilities of all state audit agencies.

The auditor general shall notify, in writing, the requesting state department or agency of the results of his or her analysis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 422, § 1.

22-13-7.
Disclosure of confidential health care information.

A patient’s confidential health care information shall be released or transferred without the written consent of the patient or the patient’s authorized representative to the auditor general or his or her designated representative for the purpose of conducting financial audits, management audits, program evaluations, and research, provided the personnel shall not identify, directly or indirectly, any individual patient in any report of the audit, evaluation, or research, or otherwise disclose patient identities in any manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 422, § 1.

22-13-8.
Submission by departments and agencies of monthly financial reports to auditor general.

Departments and agencies as defined in P.L. 1983, ch. 2, art. 1, § 1, shall meet at least monthly and shall submit a report on a monthly basis to the auditor general, which report shall contain any information that the auditor general shall deem necessary to determine the actual and contingent impact of their actions on the fiscal integrity of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 2, art. IV, § 1.

22-13-9.
Access to executive sessions of a public agency — Access to records — Disclosure by the auditor general.

Whenever a public agency goes into executive session, the auditor general or his or her designated representative shall be permitted to attend the executive session or if the auditor general or his or her designee is not in attendance at the executive session, the auditor general or his or her designee, upon written request, shall be furnished with copies of all data or materials furnished to the members of the public agency at the executive session. If the auditor general or his or her designee attends the executive session, the auditor general shall be furnished the same data in the same form and at the same time as members of the public agency.

Within three (3) working days of a written request by the auditor general, the public agency shall furnish a copy, whether approved by the agency or not, of the minutes of any meeting, including any executive session of the public agency.

The auditor general shall have full and unlimited access to any and all records of any public agency, in whatever form or mode the records may be, unless the auditor general’s access to the records is specifically prohibited or limited by federal or state law. In no case shall any confidentiality provisions of state law be construed to restrict the auditor general’s access to the records; provided, the auditor general’s access to any confidential data shall not in any way change the confidential nature of the data obtained. Where an audit or investigative finding emanates from confidential data, specific confidential information will not be made public. The records shall include those in the immediate possession of a public agency as well as records which the agency itself has a right to. In the event of a dispute between the agency involved and the auditor general as to whether or not the data involved are confidential by law, the matter will be referred to the attorney general for resolution.

If in the course of an executive session any fact comes to the attention of the auditor general or his or her designated representative, which in his or her judgment constitutes an impropriety, irregularity, or illegal transaction, or points to the onset of an impropriety or illegal transaction, then the auditor general shall disclose that information to the joint committee on legislative services, the director of administration, and the chairperson of the public agency involved. Where the facts or the data upon which the facts are based are deemed confidential pursuant to the provisions of federal or state law, the auditor general’s access to the information shall not in any way change the confidential nature of the data obtained.

In the event of a dispute between the agency involved and the auditor general as to whether or not the data involved are confidential by law, the matter will be referred to the attorney general for resolution.

The auditor general or his or her designated representative shall be immune from any liability to any party for claims arising out of disclosure authorized by this section.

For the purposes of this section, the phrase “public agency” shall include the following: the Rhode Island industrial building authority, the Rhode Island recreational building authority, the Rhode Island commerce corporation, the Rhode Island industrial facilities corporation, the Rhode Island refunding bond authority, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, the Rhode Island public transit authority, the Rhode Island student loan authority, the water resources board, the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, the Narragansett Bay commission, the convention center authority, their successors and assigns, and any other body corporate and politic which has been or which is subsequently created or established within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 73; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 10.

22-13-10.
Audit of information security systems.

The general assembly recognizes that the security of government computer systems is essential to ensuring the stability and integrity of vital information gathered and stored by government for the benefit of the citizenry and the breach of security over computer systems presents a risk to the health, safety, and welfare of the public. It is the intent of the legislature to insure that government computer systems and information residing on these systems are protected from unauthorized access, compromise, sabotage, hacking, viruses, destruction, illegal use, cyber attack or any other act which might jeopardize or harm the computer systems and the information stored on them.

In conjunction with the powers and duties outlined in this chapter, the auditor general may conduct reviews and assessments of the various government computer systems and the security systems established to safeguard these computer systems. Computer systems subject to this section shall include systems which pertain to federal, state, or local programs, and quasi-governmental bodies, and the computer systems of any entity or program which is subject to audit by the office of the auditor general. The auditor general’s review may include an assessment of system vulnerability, network penetration, potential security breaches, and susceptibility to cyber attack and cyber fraud.

In the event the review by the auditor general indicates a computer system is vulnerable, or security over the system is lacking, those findings shall not be disclosed publicly and shall not be considered public records. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the workpapers developed in connection with the review of the computer system and the security over the system shall not be deemed public records and are not subject to disclosure. The auditor general’s findings may be disclosed at the discretion of the auditor general to the chief information officer of the state as well as the joint committee on legislative services. Unless the auditor general authorizes the release of information or findings gathered in the conduct of a review of computer system security, all such information shall be deemed classified, confidential, secret, and non-public.

In order to maintain the integrity of the computer system, the auditor general may procure the services of specialists in information security systems or other contractors deemed necessary in conducting reviews under this section, and in procuring those services shall be exempt from the requirements of the state purchasing law or regulation.

Any outside contractor or vendor hired to provide services in the review of the security of a computer system shall be bound by the confidentiality provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 349, § 1.